Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-41 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wildland Fire
Protection Act”.
Req. No. 12487 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-42 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Electric cooperative” means a cooperative as defined
pursuant to Section 437.1 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Electric utility” means an electric cooperative or public
utility;
3. “Electrical wildland fire protection plan” means a plan that
is prepared by an electric utility for the purpose of mitigating a
wildland fire within the utility’s service area;
4. “Injuries arising from the ownership of property” means all
claims for property damage, trespass, nuisance, loss of use,
injuries to timber, loss of employment, or emotional distress
arising from a wildland fire;
5. “Public utility” means a utility as defined pursuant to
Section 151 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
6. “Wildland fire” means any uncontrolled fire on forests,
grasslands, fields, croplands, or wildlands; provided, wildland fire
also includes any such fire which damages or destroys improvements
or structures.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-43 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 12487 Page 2

A. An electric utility operating in this state may prepare an
electrical wildland fire protection plan in accordance with the
requirements of this section as deemed necessary by the utility for
the purpose of mitigating wildland fires.
B. An electrical wildland fire protection plan under this
section shall include a description of:
1. Areas within the service area of the electric utility that
may be subject to a heightened risk of wildland fire;
2. The procedures, standards, and time frames that the electric
utility will use to inspect its infrastructure and perform
vegetation management;
3. Proposed modifications or upgrades to facilities;
4. Preventative programs that the electric utility will
implement to reduce the risk of its electric facilities initiating a
wildfire;
5. The procedures that the electric utility intends to use to
restore its electrical system in the event of a wildland fire; and
6. Potential consultation, if applicable, with state or local
wildland fire protection plans.
C. Any electric utility that prepares an electrical wildland
fire protection plan under this section shall maintain a copy of
such plan and make it available for public inspection upon request.
The utility shall consider input from the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, the State Fire Marshal, and any
Req. No. 12487 Page 3

othe r appropriate federal, state, or local entity that requests to
provide input to the utility.
D. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require an
electric utility to implement modifications or upgrades to
facilities or preventative programs which, commensurate with the
level of risk of wildland fire for an area within the utility’s
service area, are not commonly utilized in the electric distribution
and transmission process of the utility or exceed comparable
industry standards.
E. An electric utility may recover in rates all prudently
incurred investments and expenditures, including capital costs, as a
result of the implementation of an electrical wildland fire
protection plan. A rate adjustment under this subsection shall be
subject to the requirements of Section 250 et seq. of Title 17 of
the Oklahoma Statutes. Subject to approval by the Corporation
Commission, an electric utility may defer or collect the incremental
revenue requirements for the capital investments and expenses that
are not included in base rates in order to implement an electrical
wildland fire protection plan under this act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-44 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, a person
who negligently, recklessly, or intentionally causes or spreads a
Req. No. 12487 Page 4

wild land fire shall be liable for the injuries arising from the
ownership of property which result from that wildland fire. A
person liable under this subsection shall be liable regardless of
whether the fire begins on federal, tribal, state-owned, or private
land.
B. In any civil action or other legal proceeding seeking to
recover injuries arising from the ownership of property which
resulted from a wildland fire, an electric utility shall not be
considered to have negligently caused a wildland fire if:
1. An electrical wildland fire protection plan of the electric
utility identified and sought to mitigate conditions which may have
caused or contributed to the cause of the wildland fire or fires;
2. For the area of origin of the wildland fire, the electric
utility has undertaken the fire mitigation work identified in the
electrical wildland fire protection plan, including:
a. inspection, maintenance, and repair activities,
b. modifications or upgrades to facilities or the
construction of new facilities,
c. vegetation management, and
d. preventative programs; or
3. The electric utility is denied or delayed access to a right-
of-way on land owned by a state, federal, or tribal governmental
agency after the utility requested access to the right-of-way to

Req. No. 12487 Page 5

perf orm fire mitigation work in accordance with the electrical
wildland fire protection plan.
C. 1. In the event an electric utility does not have an
electrical wildland fire protection plan that identified and sought
to address the potential causes of a wildland fire for fire
mitigation purposes, a property owner who suffers damages resulting
from a wildland fire caused intentionally, recklessly, or
negligently by an electric utility may bring an action under this
section to recover injuries arising from the ownership of property
which resulted from the wildland fire.
2. An award for damages for injuries arising from the ownership
of property from a wildland fire, including loss of vegetation,
shall be the lesser of:
a. the cost to restore the real property to the condition
it was in prior to the wildland fire, or
b. the difference between:
(1) the fair market value of the real property before
the wildland fire, and
(2) the fair market value of the real property after
the wildland fire.
3. The lack of an applicable electrical wildland fire
protection plan shall not be considered in any award for punitive
damages against an electric utility.

Req. No. 12487 Page 6

D. Nothing in this act shall be construed to address or impact
liability for and recovery of damages for bodily injuries resulting
from a wildland fire.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12487 JBH 02/06/25


















Req. No. 12487 Page 7